Utah statutes.
63L-1-203.   Jurisdiction over certain military reservations ceded -- Reservation.

Jurisdiction is ceded to the United States in and over all lands comprised within the limits of the military reservations of Fort Douglas and Fort Duchesne in this state, to continue so long as the United States shall hold and own the same for military purposes or in connection therewith, and no longer; reserving, however, to this state the right to serve all civil process and such criminal process as may lawfully issue under the authority of this state against persons charged with crimes against the laws of this state committed within or without said reservations.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

